Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.902

Invalidity of part not to affect remainder.

If any provision of this title, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the title, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected.

[ 2003 c 111 s 160. Prior: 1965 c 9 s 29.98.030. Formerly RCW 29.98.030.]